Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2903.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 6, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 6-194, to read: START_STATUTE6-194. Social credit score; lending; prohibition This state may not require a bank or financial institution to use a social credit score when the bank or financial institution evaluates whether to lend money to a customer. END_STATUTE